North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 3A. Special Prosecution Division.

§ 114-11.6.
Division established; duties.

There is hereby established in the office of the Attorney General of North Carolina, a Special Prosecution Division. The attorneys assigned to this Division shall be available to prosecute or assist in the prosecution of criminal cases when requested to do so by a district attorney and the Attorney General approves. In addition, these attorneys assigned to this Division shall serve as legal advisers to the State Bureau of Investigation and the Police Information Network and perform any other duties assigned to them by the Attorney General.

History.

1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 813.